Oklahoma, session 2025, SB619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 803 of Title 17, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any industry operating in this state with an average energy


usage of electricity in excess of seventy-five (75) kilowatt-hours


per square foot per year or seventy thousand (70,000) British


thermal units per square foot per year for the immediately preceding


calendar year shall provide an efficiency plan every twenty-four


(24) months to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce that:


1. Proposes strategies and investments in technology that


maximize efficient use of energy; and


2. Develops energy production methods to offset energy usage


not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of energy used on an annual basis.

Req. No. 669 Page 1


B. Plans submitted to the Department shall be published on a


publicly available website.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-669 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:10 AM







































Req. No. 669 Page 2